District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.18

Equitable relief.

The Superior Court of the District of Columbia may issue an injunction or grant other equitable relief appropriate to ensure substantial compliance with or to enforce this subchapter on application by:

(1)

A covered voter alleging a grievance under this subchapter; or

(2)

An election official in the District.

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 118, 59 DCR 2542
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 18 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.